Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.021

Veterinary board of governors—Appointment, qualifications, terms, officers—Quorum.

(1) There is created a Washington state veterinary board of governors reflecting the diverse practice of animal medicine, including large animal, small animal, and specialty practice, as well as diverse types of employment and practice ownership including sole proprietorships, partnerships, and corporations. The board shall consist of nine members, six of whom shall be licensed veterinarians, one of whom shall be a licensed veterinary technician, one of whom shall be a licensed veterinarian or a licensed veterinary technician, and one of whom shall be a member of the public.

(2)(a) The licensed members shall be appointed by the governor. At the time of their appointment the licensed members of the board must be actual residents of the state in active practice as licensed practitioners of veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry, or employed as a licensed veterinary technician, as applicable. Not more than two licensed veterinary members shall be from the same congressional district. The board shall not be deemed to be unlawfully constituted and a member of the board shall not be deemed ineligible to serve the remainder of the member's unexpired term on the board solely by reason of the establishment of new or revised boundaries for congressional districts.

(b) The terms of the members shall be five years and until their successors are appointed and qualified.

(c) A member may be appointed to serve two consecutive full terms.

(d) Vacancies on the board shall be filled by the governor, the appointee to hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(3) Officers of the board shall be a chair and a vice chair to be chosen by the members of the board from among its members.

(4) A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

[ 2022 c 240 s 7; 2007 c 235 s 3; 1983 c 2 s 2. Prior: 1982 1st ex.s. c 30 s 5; 1982 c 134 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 31 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 50 s 2; 1959 c 92 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 2: See note following RCW 18.71.030.